California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(5) When a participant’s welfare-to-work plan includes assignment to a treatment program, a case manager may determine that the participant is out of compliance with that plan if, at any time, in consultation with the substance abuse treatment provider, the county determines that the participant has failed or refused to participate in a treatment program without good cause. The assigned treatment program shall be reasonably accessible within the county of residence or a nearby county.

(6) When a case manager determines that a participant in a treatment program as specified in his or her welfare-to-work plan is out of compliance with a program requirement other than participation in a required treatment program, the determination of whether the participant has good cause to be out of compliance shall include consideration of whether the participant’s substance abuse problem caused or substantially contributed to the failure to comply with the program requirements. In this determination, the county shall consult the substance abuse treatment provider as appropriate.

(d) A recipient may not participate in a substance abuse treatment program for longer than six months without concurrently participating in a work activity, to be determined by the county and the recipient, in consultation with the treatment provider. However, if the recipient is in a state-licensed
 residential facility or a certified nonresidential substance abuse program that requires him or her to stay at the program site for a minimum of three hours per day, three days per week, or otherwise not to participate in nonprogram activities, the requirements of the treatment program shall fulfill the recipient’s work activity requirement.

(e) Any funds appropriated by the Legislature for allocation to each county to eliminate barriers to employment due to participants’ substance abuse problems shall be allocated consistent with the formula used to distribute each county’s CalWORKs program allocation and shall be used to supplement, and not supplant, substance abuse treatment funds otherwise available to recipients. It is the intent of the Legislature that these funds be used to develop, expand, or develop and expand programs appropriate for CalWORKs program recipients. It is further the intent of the Legislature that, to the extent possible,
 these funds be used to maximize federal financial participation through Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.).

(f) Each county shall report annually to the state the number of CalWORKs program recipients who receive substance abuse treatment and the extent to which the allocation is sufficient to meet the need for substance abuse services as determined by the county.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 28) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 29.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.9.

(a) The department shall develop three-year pilot projects in Alameda County, San Bernardino County, and Ventura County, at the option of each county, to create an integrated and coordinated case management system for delivery of services to CalWORKs families who face multiple barriers to employment. This pilot program shall permit the exchange of information and records between members of a multidisciplinary services team for the purpose of coordinating services relevant to the prevention, identification, and treatment of the family’s
 barriers to employment. Information shared between members of the multidisciplinary services team shall be maintained in a manner to ensure maximum protection of the family’s privacy. Information shall not be shared between the team or otherwise disclosed, except as otherwise authorized by law, once an individual and his or her family no longer receive CalWORKs benefits or services.

(b) For purposes of this section and Sections 11325.91 to 11325.96, inclusive:

(1) “Multidisciplinary service team” or “team” means a team of two or more persons trained and qualified to provide one or more of the services listed in paragraph (2) who are assigned the responsibility, within an integrated welfare system, for identifying the educational, health, and social service needs of a member of an assistance unit, and for developing a plan to address those needs. Team members may include any of the
 following:

(A) Representatives of public employment services agencies under contract with the CalWORKs program.

(B) Psychiatrists, psychologists, or other trained counseling personnel involved in mental health treatment.

(C) Providers of substance abuse treatment.

(D) Medical personnel with sufficient training to provide health services.

(E) Any public or private school teacher, administrative officer, supervisor of child welfare and attendance, or certificated public personnel employee.

(F) Representatives of a domestic violence shelter.

(G) Probation
 officers.

(H) Social workers with experience or training in child abuse or abuse of elder or dependent adults.

(I) Representatives from public housing agencies.

(J) Other team members may be added if necessary and if approved by the client if the team member agrees to abide by the confidentiality requirements in Section 11325.93.

(2) “Integrated welfare system” means programs established by the state or by the pilot project county governments to provide two or more of the following services to households in which recipients of benefits under this chapter reside:

(A) Child welfare services.

(B) Employment services.

(C) Health care services.

(D) Mental health services.

(E) Substance abuse prevention and treatment.

(F) Child abuse prevention, identification, and treatment.

(G) Elder or dependent adult abuse prevention, identification, and treatment.

(H) Public housing services.

(I) Domestic violence counseling services.

(J) Juvenile probation services. However, representatives of juvenile probation may provide information to other team members, but may not receive information, records, or copies of records, from
 other team members.

(K) Educational services for children and adults.

(L) Nutrition services.

(M) Child care and development services.

(N) Learning disability evaluation.

(3) “Targeted population” means long-term welfare-dependent families with multiple barriers to employment, including, but not limited to, substance abuse, mental illness, child abuse and neglect, and domestic violence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 919, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.91.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for purposes of Section 10850, a team engaged in any activity permitted pursuant to Section 11325.93 shall be deemed to be engaged in the administration of public social services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 919, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.93.

(a) Team members may disclose to one another information about, and view records on, members of an assistance unit to the extent permitted by this section, for CalWORKs clients in the targeted population. In the operation of the pilot projects authorized by Section 11325.9, information disclosed or records viewed by team members shall be limited to relevant information or records necessary to formulate an integrated services plan or to deliver services to children and families. All information or documents, or copies of documents, to be
 disclosed by team members shall be necessary to the prevention, identification, and treatment of a parent’s or guardian’s barriers to employment.

(b) If team members require records held by other team members, copies may be provided subject to the limitations of subdivision (c). Requests for copies shall be limited to the records necessary to formulate an integrated services plan, or to deliver services to children and their families.

(c) (1) Team members who receive information or records pertaining to a member of an assistance unit shall be allowed to establish and maintain a common computer data base for the purpose of planning and delivering services. The data base may contain demographic data and data on the level of individual involvement with an assistance unit member. The data base shall be for the use and disclosure only within the program, except by
 properly authorized consent of the CalWORKs recipient. A memorandum of understanding shall be established that specifies what types of information may be shared and for what purposes.

(2) Juvenile probation services shall be involved in the integrated welfare system for the limited purpose of providing information that directly affects the parent’s or guardian’s ability to participate in employment training or employment.

(3) Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code, shall apply to the programs or services providing integrated services. Programs or services that seek access to an individual’s medical information, including mental health and drug treatment records, shall be required to obtain informed authorization from the individual or from the custodial parent or guardian if the individual is a minor, unless a minor is authorized to give consent.
 Medical information shall not be disclosed to any individual who is not authorized to have that information pursuant to the authorization. Medical information shall not be disclosed for any purpose not authorized by the authorization. A client shall have access to his or her medical information and the right to correct any inaccurate information.

(4) The pilot program may authorize use of information contained in the data base for bona fide evaluation and research purposes, unless otherwise prohibited by law. No information disclosed under this paragraph shall permit identification of the CalWORKs recipient or his or her family members.

(5) The release of copies of records protected by evidentiary privileges, as defined in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 930) of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, may take place only after the team has received a form permitting release of records
 on the assistance unit member, which is signed by the member or the member’s custodial parent or guardian if the member is a minor. This paragraph shall not be construed to waive any right of privilege contained in the Evidence Code, except in compliance with Section 912 of that code.

(d) The sharing of information permitted under subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) shall be governed by memoranda of understanding among the agencies represented on the team. These memoranda shall specify the types of information that may be shared without a signed release form, in accordance with subdivision (c), and the process to be used to ensure that current confidentiality requirements, as described in subdivision (e), are met.

(e) Every team member shall be under the same privacy and confidentiality obligations and subject to the same confidentiality penalties as the person disclosing or providing
 the information or records. The information or records obtained shall be maintained in a manner that ensures the maximum protection of privacy and confidentiality rights.

(f) This section shall not be construed to restrict guarantees of confidentiality provided under federal law.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the authority of a health care provider to disclose medical information pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 56.10 of the Civil Code.

(h) Information and records communicated or provided to the pilot programs by all providers, programs, and agencies, as well as information and records created by the program in the course of serving CalWORKs recipients and their families, shall be deemed private and confidential, and shall be protected from discovery and disclosure by
 all applicable statutory and common-law protections. Civil and criminal penalties shall apply to the inappropriate disclosure of information held by the pilot programs. This section shall not affect the authority of a health care provider to disclose medical information pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 56.10 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 919, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.95.

The department shall prepare a report, for submission to the Legislature on or before April 1, 2002, on the outcomes of the pilot program established pursuant to Sections 11325.9 to 11325.93, inclusive, improving coordinated case management, assisting hard-to-serve CalWORKs families in alleviating multiple barriers to employment, and integrating service delivery within the multidisciplinary services team structure. The department shall also include in the report an analysis of the impact that record and information sharing has on CalWORKs recipients and their
 families, whether this information sharing pilot program results in increased employment rates of hard-to-serve parents, and whether there are any adverse consequences to recipients resulting from information sharing among agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 919, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11327.

Any county which fails to provide services according to its plan approved pursuant to this article shall receive sanctions in accordance with Section 10605. A recipient or a group of recipients may request the director to invoke Section 10605.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 306, Sec. 30.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11327.4.

(a) (1) Whenever an individual has failed or refused to comply with program requirements without good cause in a program component to which they are assigned and refuses to agree to or fails, without good cause, to comply with a compliance plan agreed to between the county and the participant, the individual shall be subject to sanctions specified in Section 11327.5.

(2) For the purposes of this article, the phrase “failed or refused to comply with program requirements” shall be limited to: failing or refusing to sign a welfare-to-work
 plan, participate or provide required proof of satisfactory progress in any assigned program activity, pursuant to this article, including self-initiated programs described in Section 11325.23 or accept employment; terminating employment; or reducing earnings.

(b) (1) Upon determination that an individual has failed or refused to comply with program requirements, the county shall issue a notice of action effective no earlier than 30 calendar days from the date of issuance informing the individual that a sanction will be imposed if the individual fails to either attend an appointment scheduled by the county to be held within 20 calendar days of the notice, or contact the county by phone, within 20 calendar days of the notice, and fails to do either of the following:

(A) Provide information to the county that
 they had good cause for the refusal or failure that has led the county to make a finding of good cause for nonparticipation.

(B) Agree to a compliance plan to correct the failure or refusal to comply.

(2) The county shall schedule a time during which each individual who has failed or refused to comply with program requirements has an opportunity to demonstrate that
 they had good cause for that refusal or failure. The county shall schedule an appointment within 20 calendar days of the notice of action. The individual shall be allowed to reschedule the cause determination appointment at least once within the 20-calendar-day period.

(3) The written notice of action sent by the county shall do all of the following:

(A) Inform the individual of the specific act or acts that have caused the individual to be out of compliance with participation requirements.

(B) Inform the individual of
 their right to assert good cause for
 their refusal or failure.

(C) Inform the individual of the date and time of the scheduled appointment.

(D) Provide a general definition of good cause and examples of reasons that constitute good cause for not participating in the program.

(E) Inform the individual of the right to contact the county welfare department by telephone to establish good cause over the telephone in lieu of attending the appointment scheduled by the county.

(F) Inform the individual of the right to reschedule the appointment once within the 20-calendar-day period.

(G) Inform the individual that if good cause is not found, a compliance plan will be developed and the
 individual will be expected to agree to the plan or face a sanction.

(H) Inform the individual of the name, telephone number, and address of state and local legal aid and welfare rights organizations that may assist the individual with the good cause and compliance plan process.

(I) Describe the transportation and child care services that a person is entitled to, as needed in order to attend the appointment.

(c) If the individual fails to attend the appointment, the county shall attempt to contact the individual by telephone at the time of or after the appointment in order to establish a finding of good cause or no good cause, and, if a finding of no good cause is made, develop a compliance plan to correct the instance of nonparticipation.

(d) If the
 individual fails to attend the meeting and the county is not able to contact the individual in accordance with subdivision (c), and the individual fails to contact the county within the 20-calendar-day period, a sanction shall be imposed in accordance with Section 11327.5.

(e) If the individual attends the appointment or contacts the county by phone within the 20-calendar-day period and is either found by the county to have had good cause for their refusal or failure, or agrees to a compliance plan to correct the failure or refusal, the county shall rescind the notice of action issued pursuant to subdivision (b). If the individual agrees to a compliance plan at the appointment, the individual shall be provided a copy of the plan. If the
 individual agrees to a compliance plan over the telephone, a copy of the plan shall be mailed to the client.

(f) If the individual is found by the county to have had good cause for
 their
 refusal or failure, an instance of noncompliance shall not be considered to have occurred.

(g) If the individual is found by the county not to have had good cause, but agrees to a compliance plan and then fulfills the terms of the compliance plan, an instance of noncompliance shall not be considered to have occurred.

(h) If the individual enters into a written compliance plan, but does not fulfill the terms of the plan, and the county determines, based on available information, that the individual did not have good cause for failure to meet the terms of the plan, the county shall send a notice of action to impose a sanction. The procedures specified in subdivision (b) shall not be applicable to a sanction imposed under this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 21.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11327.41.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a person shall not be subject to the sanctions specified in Section 11327.5 unless the county verifies that the person had childcare available at the time they were supposed to participate in a specified welfare-to-work activity.

(b) Prior to imposing sanctions pursuant to Section 11327.5, the county shall confirm that it provided the participant a request form and the reimbursement rules for childcare supportive services and that, if eligible for childcare supportive services, the participant had secured childcare.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340)
 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, or, if automation is necessary, the later of July 1, 2026, or on the date the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 22.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2026, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11327.5.

(a) Sanctions shall be imposed in accordance with subdivision (b) or (c), as appropriate, if an individual has failed or refused to comply with program requirements without good cause and conciliation efforts, as described in Section 11327.4, have failed.

(b) The sanctions provided for in subdivisions (c) and (d) shall not apply to an individual who is exempt from the requirements of this article but is voluntarily participating in the program. If that individual engages in conduct that would bring about the actions provided for in subdivisions (c) and (d), except for his or her status as a voluntary program participant, the individual shall not be given priority so long as other individuals are actively seeking to
 participate.

(c) Financial sanctions for failing or refusing to comply with program requirements without good cause shall cause a reduction in the family’s grant by removing the noncomplying family member from the assistance unit for a period of time specified in subdivision (d).

(1) For families that qualify for aid due to unemployment of the family’s primary wage earner, the sanctioned parent shall be removed from the assistance unit. Unless the spouse or the family’s second parent meets the provisions of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2), if the sanctioned parent’s spouse or the family’s second parent is not participating in the program, both the sanctioned parent and the spouse or second parent shall be removed from the assistance unit. The county shall notify the spouse of the noncomplying participant or second parent in writing at the commencement of conciliation of his or
 her own opportunity to participate and the impact on sanctions of that participation.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), exemption criteria specified in Section 11320.3, conciliation specified in Section 11327.4, and good cause criteria specified in Section 11320.31 and subdivision (f) of Section 11320.3 shall apply to the sanctioned parent’s spouse or the family’s second parent.

(B) Exemption criteria specified in paragraphs (5) and (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3 do not apply to a spouse or second parent who is participating to avoid the sanction of the noncomplying parent.

(C) If the sanctioned parent’s spouse or the family’s second parent chooses to participate to avoid the noncomplying parent’s sanction, subsequently fails or refuses to participate without good cause,
 and does not conciliate, he or she shall be removed from the assistance unit for a period of time specified in subdivision (d).

(D) If the sanctioned parent’s spouse or the family’s second parent is under his or her own sanction at the time of the first parent’s sanction, the spouse or second parent shall not be provided the opportunity to avoid the first parent’s sanction until the spouse or second parent’s sanction is completed.

(3) For families that qualify due to the absence or incapacity of a parent, only the noncomplying parent shall be removed from the assistance unit.

(4) If the noncomplying individual is the only dependent child in the family, his or her needs shall not be taken into account in determining the family’s need for assistance and the amount of the assistance payment.

(5) If the noncomplying individual is one of several dependent children in the family, his or her needs shall not be taken into account in determining the family’s need for assistance and the amount of the assistance payment.

(d) An instance of noncompliance without good cause shall result in a financial sanction. This sanction shall terminate at any point if the noncomplying participant performs the activity or activities he or she previously refused to perform.

(e) Sanctions shall become effective on the first day of the first payment-month that the sanctioned individual’s needs are removed from aid under this chapter.

(f) In the event this section conflicts with federal law, the department shall adopt regulations to conform to federal
 law.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex., Ch. 8, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 8, Sec. 15.   (SB 72)   Effective March 24, 2011.   Conditionally superseded on or after July 1, 2026; See amendment by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11327.5.

(a) Sanctions shall be imposed in accordance with subdivision (b) or (c), as appropriate, if an individual has failed or refused to comply with program requirements without good cause and conciliation efforts, as described in Section 11327.4, have failed.

(b) (1) The sanctions provided for in subdivisions (c) and (d) shall not apply to an individual who is exempt from the requirements of this article but is voluntarily participating in the program. If that individual engages in conduct that would bring about the actions provided for in subdivisions (c) and (d), except for
 their
 status as a voluntary program participant, the individual shall not be given priority so long as other individuals are actively seeking to participate.

(2) Within the first 90 days after an individual is determined eligible for aid, the sanctions provided for in subdivisions (c) and (d) shall not apply.

(c) Financial sanctions for failing or refusing to comply with program requirements without good cause shall cause a reduction in the family’s grant by removing the noncomplying family member from the assistance unit for a period of time specified in subdivision (d).

(1) For families that qualify for aid due to unemployment of the family’s primary wage earner, the sanctioned parent shall be
 removed from the assistance unit. Unless the spouse or the family’s second parent meets the provisions of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2), if the sanctioned parent’s spouse or the family’s second parent is not participating in the program, both the sanctioned parent and the spouse or second parent shall be removed from the assistance unit. The county shall notify the spouse of the noncomplying participant or second parent in writing at the commencement of conciliation of their own opportunity to participate and the impact on sanctions of that participation.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), exemption criteria specified in Section 11320.3, conciliation specified in Section 11327.4, and good cause criteria specified in Section 11320.31 and subdivision (f) of Section 11320.3 shall apply to the sanctioned parent’s spouse or the family’s second parent.

(B) Exemption criteria specified in paragraphs (5) and (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3 do not apply to a spouse or second parent who is participating to avoid the sanction of the noncomplying parent.

(C) If the sanctioned parent’s spouse or the family’s second parent chooses
 to participate to avoid the noncomplying parent’s sanction, subsequently fails or refuses to participate without good cause, and does not conciliate, they shall be removed from the assistance unit for a period of time specified in subdivision (d).

(D) If the sanctioned parent’s spouse or the family’s second parent is under their own sanction at the time of the first parent’s sanction, the spouse or second parent shall not be provided the opportunity to avoid the first parent’s sanction until the spouse or second parent’s sanction is completed.

(3) For families that qualify due to the absence or incapacity of a parent, only the noncomplying parent shall be removed from the assistance unit.

(4) If the noncomplying individual is the only dependent child in the family, their needs shall not be taken into account in determining the family’s need for assistance and the amount of the assistance payment.

(5) If the noncomplying individual is one of several dependent children in the family,
 their needs shall not be taken into account in determining the family’s need for assistance and the amount of the assistance payment.

(d) (1) An instance of noncompliance without good cause shall result in a financial sanction. This sanction shall terminate at any point if the noncomplying participant indicates to the county verbally or in writing that they want to cure their sanction and that they want to begin participating in welfare-to-work activities, or at any point the county verifies or otherwise discovers that, based on the
 most recent documentation available, the individual is or has been meeting the federally required minimum average number of hours per week of welfare-to-work participation as set forth in Section 607 of Title 42 of the United States Code. If the participant wants to change their assigned activities, the county and the participant shall agree verbally or in writing to a new or amended welfare-to-work plan.

(2) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer the changes made to this subdivision by the act that added this paragraph, through all-county letters or similar instruction that shall have the same force and effect as regulations until regulations are
 adopted.

(e) Sanctions shall become effective on the first day of the first payment-month that the sanctioned individual’s needs are removed from aid under this chapter.

(f) In the event this section conflicts with federal law, the department shall adopt regulations to conform to federal law.

(g) The changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026, or, if automation is necessary, the later of July 1, 2026, or on the date the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement the changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 23.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2026, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11327.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person who is not required, but who volunteers, to participate in the program established by this article and fails to appear for a scheduled appointment prior to entering into the welfare-to-work plan shall be deemed to not be subject to the requirements of this article and the conciliation efforts and sanction requirements established under Sections 11327.4 and 11327.5 shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 120.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11327.8.

(a) Except as specified in this section, whenever a participant believes that any program requirement or assignment in this program is in violation of his or her welfare-to-work plan or is inconsistent with this article, the participant may request a state hearing pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10950) of Part 2 or utilize a formal grievance procedure to be established by the county board of supervisors and specified in each county plan.

(b) If the participant
 is not satisfied with the outcome of the grievance procedure, he or she may appeal the decision in accordance with the procedures set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10950) of Part 2. Participants shall be subject to sanctions pending the outcome of the formal grievance procedure or any subsequent appeal, only if they fail to participate during the period the grievance procedure is being processed. However, a participant shall not utilize the grievance procedure to appeal the results of an assessment made pursuant to Section 11325.4.

(c) If a participant is not satisfied with the decision of a hearing conducted pursuant to Section 10950 concerning on-the-job working conditions or workers’ compensation coverage, the participant may file a further appeal with the appropriate state regulating agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 902, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11327.9.

In determining whether good cause exists for a refusal or failure to comply with program requirements, the county shall take into consideration whether the participant has a mental disability that caused or substantially contributed to the refusal or failure to comply with program requirements. This determination shall be made, where appropriate, in consultation with the county mental health department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 122.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11328.2.

A participant under this article shall have all due process rights granted pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10950) of Part 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1568, Sec. 7.   Effective September 30, 1990.   Operative October 1, 1990, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1568.)
-------------------------------------------

11328.8.

(a) The department, under the direction of the Health and Welfare Agency, the Chancellor’s office of the California Community Colleges, and the State Department of Education shall each develop and implement regulations whereby any payment for education and training services from funds appropriated for the purposes of this article and delivered pursuant to Section 11322.6 by an entity contracting with a county shall be made in accordance with a competitively selected fixed unit price performance-based contract. Under these contracts, full
 payment shall not be considered earned until either of the following has occurred:

(1) The participant has successfully completed the education program.

(2) The participant has successfully completed the job training program and has been retained in unsubsidized employment for at least 180 days.

(b) Up to 70 percent of the fixed unit price for job training may be paid upon placement. At least 30 percent of the fixed unit price for job training shall be withheld for the followup during the 180-day retention period. Progress payments shall be made from this portion upon evidence of job retention at 30, 90, and 180 days. A pro rata share of the 70 percent payment shall be paid to the training provider if the participant fails to complete the training.

(c) The department may exempt county contracts for CalWORKs educational services from subdivisions (a) and (b) in instances where counties are unable to obtain educational services due to the absence of an available adult education program or the small number of CalWORKs referrals. The department, in conjunction with the State Department of Education, shall develop criteria for granting the exemptions from subdivisions (a) and (b). The departments shall also consider using funds set aside for CalWORKs educational services in the State Department of Education’s annual budget allocation or funds allocated to the State Department of Education for CalWORKs costs in the annual Budget Act, to pay for the costs of education contracts permitted by this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 902, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11329.

(a) The department shall evaluate the program and shall collect data on program cost, caseload movement, and program outcomes, including data on all of the following:

(1) The numbers of voluntary and mandatory participants in each program component.

(2) The amount of time that each participant remains in each component and the types of services, including supportive services, each participant receives.

(3) The number of recipients in each component that move to each of the other components.

(4) The number of participants sanctioned as well as the amount and duration of the sanction, the reason for the sanction, and the amount of time the participant was in the program prior to the sanction.

(5) The number of participants who go off aid, and to the extent possible, the reason they have gone off aid.

(6) The number of applicants who reapplied for and received aid after having gone off aid during the time they were participating in the program.

(7) The starting salary of employed participants.

(8) Participants’ job retention
 rates.

(9) The appropriateness of the categorization of participants.

(10) The appropriateness of assessments and employment plans.

(11) The appropriateness of preemployment preparation assignments, including a periodic review of the appropriateness of these assignments.

(12) The effectiveness of training components based upon the number of individuals placed in employment.

(13) The timeliness of preemployment preparation assignment reviews.

(14) The appropriateness of sanctions applied under this article.

(b) The department may use standard statistical sampling
 methods to conduct the evaluation. The department shall maintain this data for the state and for each county. The department may contract with a qualified organization for the evaluation required by this section. The department shall submit a plan for implementing this evaluation to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. To the extent possible, the data collection system for this evaluation shall be designed to collect data in the least expensive and least time-consuming manner possible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 243.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11329.2.

(a) The department shall seek any federal funds available for implementation of this article, including, but not limited to, funds available under Title IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.).

(b) (1) The department shall seek any waiver from the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services which is necessary to implement this article.

(2) Any provision of this article that may only be implemented pursuant to a waiver from the United States Department of Health and Human Services shall only be operative during the period for which the waiver is granted, as stated in a declaration that shall be executed by the director when the waiver is obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 127.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11329.4.

(a) No funds appropriated for purposes of this article shall be used to fund education or training services in any county plan if these services could reasonably be provided by local educational agencies from Section A or Section B of the State School Fund which are not otherwise committed.

(b) No local educational agency shall be authorized to receive funds appropriated for purposes of this article unless it has demonstrated that it has fully committed all the funds from Section A or Section B of the State School Fund available to it, as